Tennessee, session 114, HB0429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 15, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
65-15-312. Impersonation of a transportation network company driver.
(a) It is an offense for a person to:
(1) Impersonate a transportation network company driver by making a
false statement, using a false display of distinctive signage or emblems known as
a trade dress, trademark, branding, or logo of the transportation network
company, or another act which falsely represents that the person has a current
connection with a transportation network company; or
(2) Falsely represent that the person is responding to a passenger ride
request for a transportation network company.
(b)
(1) A violation of subsection (a) occurring during the commission of a
separate felony offense is a Class E felony.
(2) A violation of subsection (a) that does not occur during the
commission of a felony offense is a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. The heading in this act is for reference purposes only and does not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the heading in any compilation or publication containing this act.
HB0429
001870
- 1 -

SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to conduct occurring on or after that date.
- 2 - 001870